Hawaii statutes.
§383-10 Definition of wages. As used
in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
"wages", subject to section 383-11, means all remuneration for
services from whatever source, including commissions and bonuses, tips or
gratuities paid directly to an individual by a customer of the employer and
reported to the employer, and the cash value of all remuneration in any medium
other than cash. The reasonable cash value of remuneration in any medium other
than cash shall be estimated and determined in accordance with rules prescribed
by the department of labor and industrial relations. [L 1939, c 219, §2(p); am
L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 12; RL 1945, §4211; am L 1953, c 23, §1(2); RL
1955, §93-10; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-10; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c
288, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next